language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 472 Y 9
SFX 472 0 og .
SFX 472 0 ogo .
SFX 472 0 ogožkuli .
SFX 472 0 om .
SFX 472 0 omu .
SFX 472 0 omužkuli .
SFX 472 0 omžkuli .
SFX 472 0 ym .
SFX 472 0 ymžkuli .
SFX 473 Y 14
SFX 473 0 ach .
SFX 473 0 achmej .
SFX 473 0 achmy .
SFX 473 0 achu .
SFX 473 0 ašo .
SFX 473 0 aštej .
SFX 473 0 ašćo .
SFX 473 0 e .
SFX 473 0 m .
SFX 473 0 mej .
SFX 473 0 my .
SFX 473 0 tej .
SFX 473 0 śo .
SFX 473 0 š .
SFX 474 Y 19
SFX 474 0 a .
SFX 474 0 ach .
SFX 474 0 am .
SFX 474 0 ami .
SFX 474 0 e .
SFX 474 0 eg .
SFX 474 0 ego .
SFX 474 0 ej .
SFX 474 0 eje .
SFX 474 0 eju .
SFX 474 0 em .
SFX 474 0 emu .
SFX 474 0 ow .
SFX 474 0 u .
SFX 474 0 y .
SFX 474 0 ych .
SFX 474 0 ym .
SFX 474 0 yma .
SFX 474 0 ymi .
SFX 475 Y 20
SFX 475 0 a .
SFX 475 0 ach .
SFX 475 0 am .
SFX 475 0 ami .
SFX 475 0 i .
SFX 475 0 ijo .
SFX 475 0 ijom .
SFX 475 0 ijomej .
SFX 475 0 ijomy .
SFX 475 0 ijotej .
SFX 475 0 ijośo .
SFX 475 0 ijoš .
SFX 475 0 iju .
SFX 475 0 oju .
SFX 475 0 om .
SFX 475 0 oma .
SFX 475 0 ow .
SFX 475 0 owu .
SFX 475 0 u .
SFX 475 0 y .
SFX 476 Y 19
SFX 476 0 a .
SFX 476 0 ach .
SFX 476 0 am .
SFX 476 0 ami .
SFX 476 0 ijo .
SFX 476 0 ijom .
SFX 476 0 ijomej .
SFX 476 0 ijomy .
SFX 476 0 ijotej .
SFX 476 0 ijośo .
SFX 476 0 ijoš .
SFX 476 0 iju .
SFX 476 0 oju .
SFX 476 0 om .
SFX 476 0 oma .
SFX 476 0 ow .
SFX 476 0 owu .
SFX 476 0 u .
SFX 476 0 y .
SFX 477 Y 19
SFX 477 0 a .
SFX 477 0 ach .
SFX 477 0 am .
SFX 477 0 ami .
SFX 477 0 ijo .
SFX 477 0 ijom .
SFX 477 0 ijomej .
SFX 477 0 ijomy .
SFX 477 0 ijotej .
SFX 477 0 ijośo .
SFX 477 0 ijoš .
SFX 477 0 iju .
SFX 477 0 o .
SFX 477 0 oju .
SFX 477 0 om .
SFX 477 0 oma .
SFX 477 0 ow .
SFX 477 0 owu .
SFX 477 0 u .
SFX 478 Y 12
SFX 478 0 ach .
SFX 478 0 achmej .
SFX 478 0 achmy .
SFX 478 0 achu .
SFX 478 0 ašo .
SFX 478 0 aštej .
SFX 478 0 ašćo .
SFX 478 0 e .
SFX 478 0 mej .
SFX 478 0 my .
SFX 478 0 tej .
SFX 478 0 ćo .
SFX 479 Y 13
SFX 479 0 ach .
SFX 479 0 am .
SFX 479 0 ami .
SFX 479 0 e .
SFX 479 0 o .
SFX 479 0 om .
SFX 479 0 omej .
SFX 479 0 omy .
SFX 479 0 otej .
SFX 479 0 ow .
SFX 479 0 ośo .
SFX 479 0 oš .
SFX 479 0 u .
SFX 480 Y 14
SFX 480 0 ach .
SFX 480 0 am .
SFX 480 0 ami .
SFX 480 0 e .
SFX 480 0 i .
SFX 480 0 o .
SFX 480 0 om .
SFX 480 0 omej .
SFX 480 0 omy .
SFX 480 0 otej .
SFX 480 0 ow .
SFX 480 0 ośo .
SFX 480 0 oš .
SFX 480 0 u .
SFX 481 Y 14
SFX 481 0 ach .
SFX 481 0 achmej .
SFX 481 0 achmy .
SFX 481 0 achu .
SFX 481 0 am .
SFX 481 0 ami .
SFX 481 0 ašo .
SFX 481 0 aštej .
SFX 481 0 ašćo .
SFX 481 0 e .
SFX 481 0 oma .
SFX 481 0 ow .
SFX 481 0 owu .
SFX 481 0 u .
SFX 482 Y 15
SFX 482 0 a .
SFX 482 0 ach .
SFX 482 0 achmej .
SFX 482 0 achmy .
SFX 482 0 achu .
SFX 482 0 am .
SFX 482 0 ami .
SFX 482 0 ašo .
SFX 482 0 aštej .
SFX 482 0 ašćo .
SFX 482 0 e .
SFX 482 0 oma .
SFX 482 0 ow .
SFX 482 0 owu .
SFX 482 0 u .
SFX 483 Y 18
SFX 483 0 a .
SFX 483 0 e .
SFX 483 0 eg .
SFX 483 0 ego .
SFX 483 0 ej .
SFX 483 0 eje .
SFX 483 0 eju .
SFX 483 0 em .
SFX 483 0 emu .
SFX 483 0 ich .
SFX 483 0 im .
SFX 483 0 imi .
SFX 483 0 u .
SFX 483 0 y .
SFX 483 0 ych .
SFX 483 0 ym .
SFX 483 0 yma .
SFX 483 0 ymi .
SFX 484 Y 27
SFX 484 0 ach .
SFX 484 0 achmej .
SFX 484 0 achmy .
SFX 484 0 achu .
SFX 484 0 ašo .
SFX 484 0 aštej .
SFX 484 0 ašćo .
SFX 484 0 e .
SFX 484 0 mej .
SFX 484 0 my .
SFX 484 0 o .
SFX 484 0 om .
SFX 484 0 omej .
SFX 484 0 omy .
SFX 484 0 otej .
SFX 484 0 ośo .
SFX 484 0 oš .
SFX 484 0 tej .
SFX 484 0 u .
SFX 484 0 y .
SFX 484 0 ym .
SFX 484 0 ymej .
SFX 484 0 ymy .
SFX 484 0 ytej .
SFX 484 0 yśo .
SFX 484 0 yš .
SFX 484 0 ćo .
SFX 485 Y 20
SFX 485 0 a .
SFX 485 0 e .
SFX 485 0 eg .
SFX 485 0 ego .
SFX 485 0 ej .
SFX 485 0 eje .
SFX 485 0 eju .
SFX 485 0 em .
SFX 485 0 emu .
SFX 485 0 i .
SFX 485 0 og .
SFX 485 0 ogo .
SFX 485 0 om .
SFX 485 0 omu .
SFX 485 0 u .
SFX 485 0 y .
SFX 485 0 ych .
SFX 485 0 ym .
SFX 485 0 yma .
SFX 485 0 ymi .
SFX 486 Y 20
SFX 486 0 a .
SFX 486 0 e .
SFX 486 0 eg .
SFX 486 0 ego .
SFX 486 0 ej .
SFX 486 0 eje .
SFX 486 0 eju .
SFX 486 0 em .
SFX 486 0 emu .
SFX 486 0 o .
SFX 486 0 og .
SFX 486 0 ogo .
SFX 486 0 om .
SFX 486 0 omu .
SFX 486 0 u .
SFX 486 0 y .
SFX 486 0 ych .
SFX 486 0 ym .
SFX 486 0 yma .
SFX 486 0 ymi .
SFX 487 Y 21
SFX 487 0 a .
SFX 487 0 e .
SFX 487 0 eg .
SFX 487 0 ego .
SFX 487 0 ej .
SFX 487 0 eje .
SFX 487 0 eju .
SFX 487 0 em .
SFX 487 0 emu .
SFX 487 0 i .
SFX 487 0 o .
SFX 487 0 og .
SFX 487 0 ogo .
SFX 487 0 om .
SFX 487 0 omu .
SFX 487 0 u .
SFX 487 0 y .
SFX 487 0 ych .
SFX 487 0 ym .
SFX 487 0 yma .
SFX 487 0 ymi .
SFX 488 Y 13
SFX 488 0 ch .
SFX 488 0 chmej .
SFX 488 0 chmy .
SFX 488 0 chu .
SFX 488 0 e .
SFX 488 0 m .
SFX 488 0 mej .
SFX 488 0 my .
SFX 488 0 tej .
SFX 488 0 śo .
SFX 488 0 š .
SFX 488 0 štej .
SFX 488 0 šćo .
SFX 489 Y 12
SFX 489 0 mej .
SFX 489 0 my .
SFX 489 0 o .
SFX 489 0 om .
SFX 489 0 omej .
SFX 489 0 omy .
SFX 489 0 otej .
SFX 489 0 ośo .
SFX 489 0 oš .
SFX 489 0 tej .
SFX 489 0 u .
SFX 489 0 ćo .
SFX 490 Y 13
SFX 490 0 e .
SFX 490 0 mej .
SFX 490 0 my .
SFX 490 0 o .
SFX 490 0 om .
SFX 490 0 omej .
SFX 490 0 omy .
SFX 490 0 otej .
SFX 490 0 ośo .
SFX 490 0 oš .
SFX 490 0 tej .
SFX 490 0 u .
SFX 490 0 ćo .
SFX 491 Y 12
SFX 491 0 mej .
SFX 491 0 my .
SFX 491 0 o .
SFX 491 0 om .
SFX 491 0 omej .
SFX 491 0 omy .
SFX 491 0 otej .
SFX 491 0 ośo .
SFX 491 0 oš .
SFX 491 0 tej .
SFX 491 0 u .
SFX 491 0 śo .
SFX 492 Y 24
SFX 492 0 a .
SFX 492 0 ach .
SFX 492 0 am .
SFX 492 0 ami .
SFX 492 0 mej .
SFX 492 0 my .
SFX 492 0 o .
SFX 492 0 oju .
SFX 492 0 om .
SFX 492 0 oma .
SFX 492 0 ow .
SFX 492 0 owu .
SFX 492 0 tej .
SFX 492 0 u .
SFX 492 0 y .
SFX 492 0 yjo .
SFX 492 0 yjom .
SFX 492 0 yjomej .
SFX 492 0 yjomy .
SFX 492 0 yjotej .
SFX 492 0 yjośo .
SFX 492 0 yjoš .
SFX 492 0 yju .
SFX 492 0 ćo .
SFX 493 Y 23
SFX 493 0 a .
SFX 493 0 ach .
SFX 493 0 am .
SFX 493 0 ami .
SFX 493 0 e .
SFX 493 0 mej .
SFX 493 0 my .
SFX 493 0 oju .
SFX 493 0 om .
SFX 493 0 oma .
SFX 493 0 ow .
SFX 493 0 owu .
SFX 493 0 tej .
SFX 493 0 u .
SFX 493 0 yjo .
SFX 493 0 yjom .
SFX 493 0 yjomej .
SFX 493 0 yjomy .
SFX 493 0 yjotej .
SFX 493 0 yjośo .
SFX 493 0 yjoš .
SFX 493 0 yju .
SFX 493 0 ćo .
SFX 494 Y 30
SFX 494 0 a .
SFX 494 0 ach .
SFX 494 0 achmej .
SFX 494 0 achmy .
SFX 494 0 achu .
SFX 494 0 am .
SFX 494 0 ami .
SFX 494 0 ašo .
SFX 494 0 aštej .
SFX 494 0 ašćo .
SFX 494 0 e .
SFX 494 0 ech .
SFX 494 0 echmej .
SFX 494 0 echmy .
SFX 494 0 echu .
SFX 494 0 ešo .
SFX 494 0 eštej .
SFX 494 0 ešćo .
SFX 494 0 o .
SFX 494 0 oju .
SFX 494 0 om .
SFX 494 0 oma .
SFX 494 0 omej .
SFX 494 0 omy .
SFX 494 0 otej .
SFX 494 0 ow .
SFX 494 0 owu .
SFX 494 0 ośo .
SFX 494 0 oš .
SFX 494 0 u .
SFX 495 Y 31
SFX 495 0 a .
SFX 495 0 ach .
SFX 495 0 achmej .
SFX 495 0 achmy .
SFX 495 0 achu .
SFX 495 0 ašo .
SFX 495 0 aštej .
SFX 495 0 ašćo .
SFX 495 0 e .
SFX 495 0 eg .
SFX 495 0 ego .
SFX 495 0 ej .
SFX 495 0 eje .
SFX 495 0 eju .
SFX 495 0 em .
SFX 495 0 emu .
SFX 495 0 mej .
SFX 495 0 my .
SFX 495 0 tej .
SFX 495 0 u .
SFX 495 0 y .
SFX 495 0 ych .
SFX 495 0 ym .
SFX 495 0 yma .
SFX 495 0 ymej .
SFX 495 0 ymi .
SFX 495 0 ymy .
SFX 495 0 ytej .
SFX 495 0 yśo .
SFX 495 0 yš .
SFX 495 0 ćo .
SFX 496 Y 20
SFX 496 0 a .
SFX 496 0 ach .
SFX 496 0 am .
SFX 496 0 ami .
SFX 496 0 e .
SFX 496 0 eg .
SFX 496 0 ego .
SFX 496 0 ej .
SFX 496 0 eju .
SFX 496 0 em .
SFX 496 0 emu .
SFX 496 0 i .
SFX 496 0 ich .
SFX 496 0 im .
SFX 496 0 ima .
SFX 496 0 imi .
SFX 496 0 oma .
SFX 496 0 ow .
SFX 496 0 owu .
SFX 496 0 u .
