language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Lěwick/1,496
basnj/1,481
boboc/489
brjeńc/490
broj/473
bronj/1,481
bruc/484
brunj/1,481
buchoc/489
cakoc/489
cerj/1,481
ceš/490
chrapj/1,479
chychoc/489
dat/474
dejkoc/489
der/476
dlejš/495
dognoj/488
dogron/477
doj/473
dopiš/489
dopósćel/491
dowugoj/488
dowugój/488
dowóz/493
dozakłoj/488
dołoj/488
drapoc/489
gigoc/489
gluzgoc/489
grabj/1,479
grimoc/489
górc/495
góruc/495
górš/495
jadn/1,486
kakoc/489
kapoc/490
kiš/489
klatśkoc/489
knaboc/489
kulkoc/489
kus/493
kólnj/1,482
kłoj/473
kłopoc/489
lulkoc/489
lěpš/495
manj/1,481
mjawkoc/489
murj/1,482
měrkoc/489
nabroj/488
nadoj/488
nagnoj/488
nagron/477
nakichoc/489
nakus/493
nakłoj/488
nalěś/1,496
napałc/489
naproj/488
nasćel/491
nawěž/489
nazgón/476
naznoj/488
nałoj/488
njebaj/491
njebjatkoc/489
njeborkoc/489
njebroj/473
njebruc/484
njebulboc/489
njecapoc/489
njechychoc/489
njedejkoc/489
njedodoj/488
njedognoj/488
njedoj/473
njedopiš/489
njedopósćel/491
njedowugoj/488
njedowugój/488
njedozakłoj/488
njedołoj/488
njedrapoc/489
njedwój/473
njegigoc/489
njegluzgoc/489
njegnoj/473
njegrimoc/489
njekakoc/489
njekiwkoc/489
njeklaskoc/489
njeklěc/489
njekrjakoc/489
njekłoj/473
njekłokoc/489
njeliž/489
njelěpš/495
njemjakoc/489
njemroj/473
njemórkoc/489
njenabroj/488
njenadoj/488
njenagnoj/488
njenakaž/489
njenakłoj/488
njenaniž/489
njenapoj/488
njenaproj/488
njenasćel/491
njenatśikoc/489
njenatšoj/488
njenaznoj/488
njenałoj/488
njeniž/484
njeparskoc/489
njepišpoc/489
njeplumpoc/489
njeproj/473
njepyšpoc/489
njepódoj/488
njepódwój/488
njepógnoj/488
njepógrajkoc/489
njepómikoc/489
njepórědnjejš/495
njepóskokoc/489
njepósćel/491
njepótšoj/488
njepóznoj/488
njepółaskoc/489
njepółoj/488
njepśebroj/488
njepśeceš/489
njepśegnoj/488
njepśeklapoc/489
njepśekłoj/488
njepśeplapoc/489
njepśeproj/488
njepśepósćel/491
njepśeswój/488
njepśeznoj/488
njepśełoj/488
njepśiklěc/489
njepśipósćel/491
njepśirjapoc/489
njepśiswój/488
njepśitšoj/488
njepśiłoj/488
njerjapoc/489
njeroj/473
njerozbroj/488
njerozdwój/488
njerozesćel/491
njerozkłoj/488
njerozproj/488
njerozpósćel/491
njeroztśěskoc/489
njeskuboc/489
njeskłoj/488
njespokoj/488
njesproj/488
njesukoc/489
njetrješ/478
njetunkoc/489
njetšaboc/489
njetšoj/473
njewobgnoj/488
njewobkaš/489
njewogryž/489
njewopoj/488
njewudoj/488
njewugnoj/488
njewugój/488
njewukapoc/489
njewukłoj/488
njewupoj/488
njewuproj/488
njewupósćel/491
njewupłac/489
njewuroj/488
njewuspokoj/488
njewuswój/488
njewusćel/491
njewuznoj/488
njewułoj/488
njewóceš/489
njewótkłoj/488
njewótproj/488
njewótpósćel/491
njewótpłac/489
njewótznoj/488
njewótłoj/488
njezabroj/488
njezachychoc/489
njezagnoj/488
njezagój/488
njezaklimpoc/489
njezakłoj/488
njezapałc/489
njezapoj/488
njezapósćel/491
njezasćel/491
njezatšoj/488
njezawarkoc/489
njezaznoj/488
njezbroj/488
njezdwój/488
njezesćel/491
njezesłapoc/489
njeznoj/473
njezrjapoc/489
njezroj/488
njezłoj/488
njełoj/473
nješepoc/489
nješukoc/489
nježwakoc/489
něc/1,472
pałc/490
pjelsnj/1,481
platśkoc/489
pomyj/1,480
proj/473
proznj/1,481
pódoj/488
pódrěž/489
póduš/493
pódwój/488
pógnoj/488
pógórš/493
pólodnj/1,482
póměr/476
pónjeźel/1,496
pónos/493
pópłac/489
pórědnjejš/495
pósuš/493
pósćel/491
pótšoj/488
póznoj/488
półoj/488
pěsnj/1,482
płackoc/489
pśebroj/488
pśedgron/477
pśedpałc/490
pśedrozgron/477
pśegnoj/488
pśegron/477
pśekłoj/488
pśeměr/476
pśeplapoc/489
pśeproj/488
pśepósćel/491
pśewóz/493
pśeznoj/488
pśigron/477
pśigłos/493
pśiklěc/489
pśiměr/476
pśipósćel/491
pśirjapoc/489
pśiscyn/476
pśiswój/488
pśiwis/493
pśiwóz/493
pśiłoj/488
rjapoc/489
rozdwój/488
rozesćel/491
rozgron/477
rozgłos/493
rozkaz/493
rozkłon/476
rozměr/476
rozpósćel/491
roztśěskoc/489
sam/487
sedym/483
skuboc/489
skłoj/488
spar/475
sukoc/489
swinj/1,482
tonj/1,481
trješ/478
tunkoc/489
twarj/1,481
tšaboc/489
wobdwór/476
wobgnoj/488
wobgron/477
wobkaš/489
woblic/492
wogryž/489
wokóš/493
wokłon/476
wopałc/490
wudoj/488
wugój/488
wugón/476
wukaz/493
wukaš/489
wukóńc/493
wupoj/488
wupósćel/491
wupšoskoc/489
wuraz/493
wuroj/488
wuswój/488
wusćel/491
wutwar/475
wutwór/476
wuwóz/493
wułoj/488
wóliž/489
wón/485
wósym/483
wósłon/476
wótegron/477
wótgron/477
wótkus/493
wótkłon/475
wótměr/476
wótproj/488
wótpósćel/491
wótpłun/476
wótrěž/489
wótwór/476
wótwóz/493
wótłoj/488
zader/476
zaderkoc/489
zagnoj/488
zagron/477
zakluc/493
zaknaboc/489
zakłoj/488
zaměr/476
zapałc/490
zapokaž/489
zapósćel/491
zaraz/493
zasćel/491
zatšoj/488
zawóz/493
zawěž/489
zbroj/488
zelenj/1,481
zesćel/491
zetšumkoc/489
znos/493
zroj/488
zwrjaskoc/489
śěš/495
šerj/1,481
škraboc/489
škrj/1,482
škórc/493
šwikoc/489
šyrj/1,481
žedn/1,486
ženj/1,494
